data/dictionaries/apertium/apertium-ell.ell.dix
    <pardef n="κατηγ/όρημα__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>όρημα</l><r>όρημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όρημα</l><r>όρημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορήματος</l><r>όρημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όρημα</l><r>όρημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορήματα</l><r>όρημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορήματα</l><r>όρημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορημάτων</l><r>όρημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ορήματα</l><r>όρημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ιρ/ίδιο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ίδιο</l><r>ίδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίδιο</l><r>ίδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιδίου</l><r>ίδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίδιο</l><r>ίδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="β/ήρυλλος__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ήρυλλος</l><r>ήρυλλος<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήρυλλο</l><r>ήρυλλος<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ηρύλλου</l><r>ήρυλλος<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήρυλλε</l><r>ήρυλλος<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="θρα/ύστης__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ύστης</l><r>ύστης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύστη</l><r>ύστης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύστη</l><r>ύστης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύστη</l><r>ύστης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύστες</l><r>ύστης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύστες</l><r>ύστης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υστών</l><r>ύστης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύστες</l><r>ύστης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/έμεσμα__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>έμεσμα</l><r>έμεσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έμεσμα</l><r>έμεσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>εμέσματος</l><r>έμεσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έμεσμα</l><r>έμεσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>εμέσματα</l><r>έμεσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>εμέσματα</l><r>έμεσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>εμεσμάτων</l><r>έμεσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>εμέσματα</l><r>έμεσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="μελ/άνι__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>άνι</l><r>άνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνι</l><r>άνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ανιού</l><r>άνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνι</l><r>άνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνια</l><r>άνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνια</l><r>άνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ανιών</l><r>άνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνια</l><r>άνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="δυσπρ/όσιο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>όσιο</l><r>όσιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όσιο</l><r>όσιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οσίου</l><r>όσιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όσιο</l><r>όσιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ήχ/ος__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ος</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ο</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ου</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ε</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οι</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ους</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ων</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οι</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ασβεστ/όλιθος__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>όλιθος</l><r>όλιθος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όλιθο</l><r>όλιθος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ολίθου</l><r>όλιθος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όλιθου</l><r>όλιθος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όλιθε</l><r>όλιθος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όλιθοι</l><r>όλιθος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ολίθους</l><r>όλιθος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όλιθους</l><r>όλιθος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ολίθων</l><r>όλιθος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όλιθων</l><r>όλιθος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όλιθοι</l><r>όλιθος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="φρ/άουλα__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>άουλα</l><r>άουλα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άουλα</l><r>άουλα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άουλας</l><r>άουλα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άουλα</l><r>άουλα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άουλες</l><r>άουλα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άουλες</l><r>άουλα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αουλών</l><r>άουλα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άουλες</l><r>άουλα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Βέλγος"><i>Βέλγ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Γιαπωνέζος"><i>Γιαπωνέζ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Εβραίος"><i>Εβραί</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Ερυθρόδερμος"><i>Ερυθρόδερμ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Μεγαλειότατος"><i>Μεγαλειότατ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="άθεος"><i>άθε</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="άρτος"><i>άρτ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="άσος"><i>άσ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="έμεσμα"><i></i><par n="/έμεσμα__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ήχος"><i>ήχ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="αίλουρος"><i>αίλουρ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="αγγελιοφόρος"><i>αγγελιοφόρ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="αδελφοκτόνος"><i>αδελφοκτόν</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="αεροπόρος"><i>αεροπόρ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="αερόσακος"><i>αερόσακ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="αισιόδοξος"><i>αισιόδοξ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="αλιάετος"><i>αλιάετ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="αρχαιολόγος"><i>αρχαιολόγ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ασβεστόλιθος"><i>ασβεστ</i><par n="ασβεστ/όλιθος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="βάλτος"><i>βάλτ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="βήρυλλος"><i>β</i><par n="β/ήρυλλος__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="βετεράνος"><i>βετεράν</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="βράχος"><i>βράχ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="γάλος"><i>γάλ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="γάντζος"><i>γάντζ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="γέρος"><i>γέρ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="γαύρος"><i>γαύρ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="γόμφος"><i>γόμφ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="γύρος"><i>γύρ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="δήμος"><i>δήμ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="δούλος"><i>δούλ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="δρεπάνι"><i>δρεπ</i><par n="μελ/άνι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="δυσπρόσιο"><i>δυσπρ</i><par n="δυσπρ/όσιο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ευνούχος"><i>ευνούχ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ζωγράφος"><i>ζωγράφ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ηλίανθος"><i>ηλίανθ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="θεολόγος"><i>θεολόγ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="θραύστης"><i>θρα</i><par n="θρα/ύστης__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ιπποπόταμος"><i>ιπποπόταμ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ιρίδιο"><i>ιρ</i><par n="ιρ/ίδιο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ιστότοπος"><i>ιστότοπ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="καλλιγράφος"><i>καλλιγράφ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="κατηγόρημα"><i>κατηγ</i><par n="κατηγ/όρημα__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="κατσικόδρομος"><i>κατσικόδρομ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="κουνιάδος"><i>κουνιάδ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="κρόκος"><i>κρόκ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="κυματοθραύστης"><i>κυματοθρα</i><par n="θρα/ύστης__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="κόλπος"><i>κόλπ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="κώλος"><i>κώλ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="λιμάνι"><i>λιμ</i><par n="μελ/άνι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="λόρδος"><i>λόρδ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="μειωτέος"><i>μειωτέ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="μελάνι"><i>μελ</i><par n="μελ/άνι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="μπρούτζος"><i>μπρούτζ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="μύλος"><i>μύλ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="νοσοκόμος"><i>νοσοκόμ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="οίνος"><i>οίν</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ουρανίσκος"><i>ουρανίσκ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ουρανοξύστης"><i>ουρανοξ</i><par n="θρα/ύστης__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="πάππος"><i>πάππ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="παράμεσος"><i>παράμεσ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="προλετάριος"><i>προλετάρι</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="πρόεδρος"><i>πρόεδρ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="σβέρκος"><i>σβέρκ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="σερβιτόρος"><i>σερβιτόρ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="σκλάβος"><i>σκλάβ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="στηθόδεσμος"><i>στηθόδεσμ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="στόχος"><i>στόχ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ταβάνι"><i>ταβ</i><par n="μελ/άνι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ταύρος"><i>ταύρ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="φάρος"><i>φάρ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="φράουλα"><i>φρ</i><par n="φρ/άουλα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="χορτοφάγος"><i>χορτοφάγ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="χώρος"><i>χώρ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ώμος"><i>ώμ</i><par n="ήχ/ος__n_m"/></e>
